Ohio, session 136, SB1.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That sections 3335.02, 3335.09, 3337.01, 3339.01, 3341.02, 3343.02, 3344.01,
ECTION
3345.45, 3350.10, 3352.01, 3356.01, 3359.01, 3361.01, 3362.01, 3364.01, 4117.14, and 4117.15 be
amended and new section 3333.045 and sections 3345.029, 3345.0216, 3345.0217, 3345.0218,
3345.0219, 3345.382, 3345.451, 3345.452, 3345.453, 3345.454, 3345.455, 3345.456, 3345.591,
3345.80, and 3345.88 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows:
Sec. 3333.045. As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" has the same
meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code.
The chancellor of higher education, in consultation with state institutions of higher education
and members of their boards of trustees, shall develop and annually deliver educational programs for
members of a board of trustees of each state institution. The chancellor may deliver the programs
virtually and may offer the programs periodically throughout each year. New members of a board of
trustees shall participate in the programs at least once in their first two years in office. Current
members of a board of trustees shall participate in continuing trustee training at levels to be
determined by the chancellor.
The educational programs shall be designed to address the role, duties, and responsibilities
of a member of a board of trustees and may include in-service programs on current issues in higher
education. In developing the educational programs, the chancellor may consider similar programs
offered in other states or through a recognized trustee group.
The educational programs shall include presentations and content related to all of the
following:
(A) Each board member's duty to the state of Ohio;
(B) The committee structure and function of a board of trustees;
(C) The duties of the executive committee of a board of trustees;
(D) Professional accounting and reporting standards;

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
2
(E) Methods for meeting the statutory, regulatory, and fiduciary obligations of a board of
trustees;
(F) The requirements of the public records law;
(G) Institutional ethics and conflicts of interest;
(H) Creating and implementing institution-wide rules and regulations;
(I) Business operations, administration, budgeting, financing, financial reporting, and
financial reserves, including a segment on endowment management;
(J) Fixing student general and instructional fees, and other necessary charges, including a
review of student debt trends;
(K) Overseeing planning, construction, maintenance, expansion, and renovation projects that
impact the state institution's consolidated infrastructure, physical facilities, and natural environment,
including its lands, improvements, and capital equipment;
(L) Workforce planning, strategy, and investment;
(M) Institutional advancement, including philanthropic giving, fundraising initiatives,
alumni programming, communications and media, government and public relations, and community
affairs;
(N) Student welfare issues, including academic studies, curriculum, residence life, student
governance and activities, and the general physical and psychological well-being of undergraduate
and graduate students;
(O) Current national and state issues in higher education;
(P) Future national and state issues in higher education;
(Q) State and federal anti-discrimination laws and a state institution's obligations under
sections 3345.0217, 3345.0218, and 3345.88 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 3335.02. (A) The government of the Ohio state university shall be vested in a board of
fourteen trustees in 2005, and seventeen trustees beginning in 2006, who shall be appointed by the
governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. Two of the seventeen trustees shall be students
at the Ohio state university, and their selection and terms shall be in accordance with division (B) of
this section. Except
(1) For trustees appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except as provided in division (D)(C) of this
section and except for the terms of student members, terms of office shall be for nine years,
commencing on the fourteenth day of May and ending on the thirteenth day of May.
(2) For trustees appointed on or after July 1, 2025, except for the terms of student members,
terms of office shall be for six years, commencing on the fourteenth day of May and ending on the
thirteenth day of May.
Each trustee shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for
which the trustee was appointed. Any trustee appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of the term for which the trustee's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the
remainder of such term. Any trustee shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
3
trustee's term until the trustee's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed,
whichever occurs first. No person who has served a full nine-year term or more than six years of
such a term shall be eligible for reappointment until a period of four years has elapsed since the last
day of the term for which the person previously served. The trustees shall not receive compensation
for their services, but shall be paid their reasonable necessary expenses while engaged in the
discharge of their official duties.
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of the Ohio state university shall be
students at the Ohio state university. Unless student members have been granted voting power under
division (C) of this section, they Student members shall have no voting power on the board, shall not
be considered as members of the board in determining whether a quorum is present, and shall not be
entitled to attend executive sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be
appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five
candidates selected pursuant to a procedure adopted by the university's student governments and
approved by the university's board of trustees. The initial term of office of one of the student
members shall commence on May 14, 1988, and shall expire on May 13, 1989, and the initial term
of office of the other student member shall commence on May 14, 1988, and expire on May 13,
1990. Thereafter, terms of office of student members shall be for two years, each term ending on the
same day of the same month of the year as the term it succeeds. In the event a student member
cannot fulfill a two-year term, a replacement shall be selected to fill the unexpired term in the same
manner used to make the original selection.
(C) Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this amendment, the board of
trustees shall adopt a resolution that does one of the following:
(1) Grants the student members of the board voting power on the board. If so granted, in
addition to having voting power, the student members shall be considered as members of the board
in determining whether a quorum is present and shall be entitled to attend executive sessions of the
board.
(2) Declares that student members do not have voting power on the board.
Thereafter, the board may change the voting status of student trustees by adopting a
subsequent resolution. Each resolution adopted under this division shall take effect on the fourteenth
day of May following the adoption of the resolution. All members with voting power at the time of
the adoption of a resolution may vote on the resolution.
If student members are granted voting power under this division, no student shall be
disqualified from membership on the board of trustees because the student receives a scholarship,
grant, loan, or any other financial assistance payable out of the state treasury or a university fund, or
because the student is employed by the university in a position pursuant to a work-study program or
other student employment, including as a graduate teaching assistant, graduate administrative
assistant, or graduate research assistant, the compensation for which is payable out of the state
treasury or a university fund.

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
4
Acceptance of such financial assistance or employment by a student trustee shall not be
considered a violation of Chapter 102. or section 2921.42 or 2921.43 of the Revised Code.
(D)(1)(C)(1) The initial terms of office for the three additional trustees appointed in 2005
shall commence on a date in 2005 that is selected by the governor with one term of office expiring
on May 13, 2009, one term of office expiring on May 13, 2010, and one term of office expiring on
May 13, 2011, as designated by the governor upon appointment. Thereafter terms of office for
trustees appointed prior to July 1, 2025, shall be for nine years, as provided in division (A) (A)(1) of
this section. Terms of office for trustees appointed on or after July 1, 2025, shall be for six years, as
provided in division (A)(2) of this section.
(2) The initial terms of office for the three additional trustees appointed in 2006 shall
commence on May 14, 2006, with one term of office expiring on May 13, 2012, one term of office
expiring on May 13, 2013, and one term of office expiring on May 13, 2014, as designated by the
governor upon appointment. Thereafter terms of office for trustees appointed prior to July 1, 2025,
shall be for nine years, as provided in division (A) (A)(1) of this section. Terms of office for trustees
appointed on or after July 1, 2025, shall be for six years, as provided in division (A)(2) of this
section.
Sec. 3335.09. The board of trustees of the Ohio state university shall elect, fix the
compensation of, and remove, the president and such number of professors, teachers, and other
employees as are necessary. Except as provided under division (C) of section 3335.02 of the Revised
Code, no No trustee, or relative of a trustee by blood or marriage, shall be eligible to a professorship
or position in the university, the compensation for which is payable out of the state treasury or a
university fund. The board shall fix and regulate the course of instruction and prescribe the extent
and character of experiments to be made at the university.
Sec. 3337.01. (A) The body politic and corporate by the name and style of "The President
and Trustees of the Ohio University" now in the university instituted and established in Athens by
the name and style of "The Ohio University" shall consist of a board of trustees composed of eleven
members, who shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. At
least five of the trustees who are not students shall be graduates of Ohio university. Two of the
trustees shall be students at Ohio university, and their selection and terms shall be in accordance
with division (B) of this section. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum. Except For trustees
appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except for the terms of student members, terms of office shall be for
nine years, commencing on the fourteenth day of May and ending on the thirteenth day of May,
except that upon expiration of the term ending on May 14, 1978, the new term which succeeds it
shall commence on May 15, 1978, and end on May 13, 1987. For trustees appointed on or after July
1, 2025, except for the terms of student members, terms of office shall be for six years, commencing
on the fourteenth day of May and ending on the thirteenth day of May. Each member shall hold
office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed.
Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
5
member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of such term. Any member
shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's
successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. No person
who has served a full nine-year term or more than six years of such a term shall be eligible for
reappointment until a period of four years has elapsed since the last day of the term for which the
person previously served. Such trustees shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be
paid their actual and necessary expenses while engaged in the discharge of their official duties.
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of the Ohio university have no voting
power on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in
determining whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive
sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the
advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected pursuant to a procedure
adopted by the university's student governments and approved by the university's board of trustees.
The initial term of office of one of the student members shall commence on May 14, 1988, and shall
expire on May 13, 1989, and the initial term of office of the other student member shall commence
on May 14, 1988, and expire on May 13, 1990. Thereafter, terms of office of student members shall
be for two years, each term ending on the same day of the same month of the year as the term it
succeeds. In the event that a student member cannot fulfill the student member's two-year term, a
replacement shall be selected to fill the unexpired term in the same manner used to make the original
selection.
Sec. 3339.01. (A) The government of Miami university shall be vested in eleven trustees,
who shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Two of the
trustees shall be students at Miami university, and their selection and terms shall be in accordance
with division (B) of this section. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum. Except For trustees
appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except for the terms of student members, terms of office shall be for
nine years, commencing on the first day of March and ending on the last day of February, except
that upon expiration of the trustee term ending on March 1, 1974, the trustee term which succeeds it
shall commence on March 2, 1974, and end on February 28, 1983; upon expiration of the trustee
term ending on March 1, 1977, the trustee term which succeeds it shall commence on March 2,
1977, and end on February 28, 1986; upon expiration of the trustee term ending on March 1, 1978,
the trustee term which succeeds it shall commence on March 2, 1978, and end on February 28, 1987;
and upon expiration of the trustee term ending on March 1, 1979, the trustee term which succeeds it
shall commence on March 2, 1979, and end on February 29, 1988. For trustees appointed on or after
July 1, 2025, except for the terms of student members, terms of office shall be for six years,
commencing on the first day of March and ending on the last day of February. Each trustee shall
hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the trustee was
appointed. Any trustee appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the end of the term for which
the trustee's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of such term. Any trustee

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
6
shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the trustee's term until a successor takes
office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. No person who has served
a full nine-year term or more than six years of such a term shall be eligible for reappointment until a
period of four years has elapsed since the last day of the term for which the person previously
served. The trustees shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be paid their
reasonable necessary expenses while engaged in the discharge of their official duties.
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of Miami university have no voting power
on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in determining
whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive sessions of
the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and
consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected pursuant to a procedure adopted by
the university's student governments and approved by the university's board of trustees. The initial
term of office of one of the student members shall commence on March 1, 1988, and shall expire on
February 28, 1989, and the initial term of office of the other student member shall commence on
March 1, 1988, and expire on February 28, 1990. Thereafter, terms of office of student members
shall be for two years, each term ending on the last day of February. In the event that a student
member cannot fulfill the student member's two-year term, a replacement shall be selected to fill the
unexpired term in the same manner used to make the original selection.
Sec. 3341.02. (A) The government of Bowling Green state university is vested in a board of
eleven trustees, who shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate.
Two of the trustees shall be students at Bowling Green state university, and their selection and terms
shall be in accordance with division (B) of this section. A majority of the board constitutes a
quorum. Except For trustees appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except for the terms of student
members, terms of office shall be for nine years, commencing on the seventeenth day of May and
ending on the sixteenth day of May. No person who has served a full nine-year term or more than six
years of such a term shall be eligible for reappointment until a period of four years has elapsed since
the last day of the term for which the person previously served. For trustees appointed on or after
July 1, 2025, except for the terms of student members, terms of office shall be for six years,
commencing on the seventeenth day of May and ending on the sixteenth day of May.
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of Bowling Green state university have no
voting power on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in
determining whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive
sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the
advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected pursuant to a procedure
adopted by the university's student governments and approved by the university's board of trustees.
The initial term of office of one of the student members shall commence on March 17, 1988, and
shall expire on March 16, 1989, and the initial term of office of the other student member shall
commence on March 17, 1988, and expire on March 16, 1990. After September 22, 2000, terms of

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
7
office shall commence on the seventeenth day of May and shall end on the sixteenth day of May.
Terms of office of student members shall be for two years, each term ending on the same day of the
same month of the year as the term it succeeds. In the event that a student member cannot fulfill the
student member's two-year term, a replacement shall be selected in the manner used for the original
selection to fill the unexpired term.
(C) The government of Kent state university is vested in a board of eleven trustees, who
shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. Two of the trustees
shall be students at Kent state university, and their selection and terms shall be in accordance with
division (D) of this section. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum. Except For trustees
appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except for the terms of student members, terms of office shall be for
nine years, commencing on the seventeenth day of May and ending on the sixteenth day of May. No
person who has served a full nine-year term or more than six years of such a term shall be eligible
for reappointment until a period of four years has elapsed since the last day of the term for which the
person previously served. For trustees appointed on or after July 1, 2025, except for the terms of
student members, terms of office shall be for six years, commencing on the seventeenth day of May
and ending on the sixteenth day of May.
(D) The student members of the board of trustees of Kent state university have no voting
power on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in
determining whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive
sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the
advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected pursuant to a procedure
adopted by the university's student governments and approved by the university's board of trustees.
The initial term of office of one of the student members shall commence on May 17, 1988, and shall
expire on May 16, 1989, and the initial term of office of the other student member shall commence
on May 17, 1988, and expire on May 16, 1990. Thereafter, terms of office of student members shall
be for two years, each term ending on the same day of the same month of the year as the term it
succeeds. In the event that a student member cannot fulfill the student member's two-year term, a
replacement shall be selected to fill the unexpired term in the same manner used to make the original
selection.
(E) The trustees shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be paid their
reasonable necessary expenses while engaged in the discharge of their official duties.
(F) Each trustee shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for
which the trustee was appointed. Any trustee appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of the term for which the trustee's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the
remainder of such term. Any trustee shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the
trustee's term until a successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever
occurs first.
Sec. 3343.02. (A) The government of Central state university shall be vested in a board of

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
8
trustees to be known as "the board of trustees of the Central state university." Such board shall
consist of eleven members who shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of
the senate. Two of the trustees shall be students at Central state university, and their selection and
terms shall be in accordance with division (B) of this section. A majority of the board constitutes a
quorum. Except For trustees appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except for the student members, terms
of office shall be for nine years, commencing on the first day of July and ending on the thirtieth day
of June. For trustees appointed on or after July 1, 2025, except for the student members, terms of
office shall be for six years, commencing on the first day of July and ending on the thirtieth day of
June. Each member shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for
which the member was appointed. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the
remainder of such term. Any member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of
the member's term until the member's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has
elapsed, whichever occurs first. No person who has served a full nine-year term or more than six
years of such a term shall be eligible for reappointment until a period of four years has elapsed since
the last day of the term for which the person previously served.
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of Central state university have no voting
power on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in
determining whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive
sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the
advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected pursuant to a procedure
adopted by the university's student governments and approved by the university's board of trustees.
The initial term of office of one of the student members shall commence on July 1, 1988, and shall
expire on June 30, 1989, and the initial term of office of the other student member shall commence
on July 1, 1988, and expire on June 30, 1990. Thereafter, terms of office of student members shall
be for two years, each term ending on the same day of the same month of the year as the term it
succeeds. In the event that a student member cannot fulfill a two-year term, a replacement shall be
selected to fill the unexpired term in the same manner used to make the original selection.
Sec. 3344.01. (A) There is hereby created the Cleveland state university. The government of
the Cleveland state university is vested in a board of eleven trustees, who shall be appointed by the
governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. Two of the trustees shall be students at the
Cleveland state university, and their selection and terms shall be in accordance with division (B) of
this section. Except For trustees appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except for the student members,
terms of office shall be for nine years, commencing on the second day of May and ending on the
first day of May. For trustees appointed on or after July 1, 2025, except for the student members,
terms of office shall be for six years, commencing on the second day of May and ending on the first
day of May. Each trustee shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for
which the trustee was appointed. Any trustee appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
9
expiration of the term for which the trustee's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the
remainder of such term. Any trustee shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the
trustee's term until the trustee's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed,
whichever occurs first. No person who has served a full nine-year term or more than six years of
such a term shall be eligible for reappointment until a period of four years has elapsed since the last
day of the term for which the person previously served. The trustees shall receive no compensation
for their services but shall be paid their reasonable necessary expenses while engaged in the
discharge of their official duties. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of the Cleveland state university have no
voting power on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in
determining whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive
sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the
advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected pursuant to a procedure
adopted by the university's student governments and approved by the university's board of trustees.
The initial term of office of one of the student members shall commence on May 2, 1988, and shall
expire on May 1, 1989, and the initial term of office of the other student member shall commence on
May 2, 1988, and expire on May 1, 1990. Thereafter, terms of office of student members shall be for
two years, each term ending on the same day of the same month of the year as the term it succeeds.
In the event that a student member cannot fulfill a two-year term, a replacement shall be selected to
fill the unexpired term in the same manner used to make the original selection.
Sec. 3345.029. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Community college" has the same meaning as in section 3333.168 of the Revised Code.
(2) "Course syllabus" means a document produced for students by a course instructor that
includes all of the following:
(a) The name of the course instructor;
(b) A calendar for the course outlining what materials and topics will be covered and when
during the course they will be covered;
(c) A list of any required or recommended readings for the course;
(d) The course instructor's professional qualifications.
(3) "General syllabus" means a document produced for students by a community college
regarding a course that includes both of the following:
(a) A calendar for the course outlining what materials and topics will be covered and when
during the course they will be covered;
(b) A list of any required or recommended readings for the course.
(4) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of
the Revised Code.
(B) Beginning in the 2026-2027 academic year, each state institution of higher education
shall make a syllabus for each undergraduate course it offers for college credit publicly available by

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
10
doing one of the following:
(1) Ensuring that each course instructor posts a course syllabus on a publicly accessible web
site. Each such web site shall include the following information:
(a) The course instructor's professional qualifications;
(b) The course instructor's contact information;
(c) The course instructor's course schedule;
(d) The course syllabus for each course the instructor is currently teaching, which shall be
accessible by link or download through the web site.
(2) Posting a course syllabus for each course on the institution's publicly accessible web site.
Each course syllabus shall be all of the following:
(a) Accessible from the main page of the state institution's web site by use of not more than
three links;
(b) Searchable by keywords and phrases;
(c) Accessible to the public without requiring user registration of any kind.
(3) If the institution is a community college, posting a general syllabus for a course on the
college's publicly accessible web site. Each general syllabus shall be all of the following:
(a) Accessible from the main page of the college's web site by use of not more than three
links;
(b) Searchable by keywords and phrases;
(c) Accessible to the public without requiring user registration of any kind.
(C)(1) Each state institution shall make a syllabus available in accordance with division (B)
of this section not later than the first day of classes for the semester or academic term in which the
course is offered.
(2) For any syllabus posted under division (B)(1) of this section that is no longer used, the
course instructor shall, upon request, make that syllabus available for not less than two years after
that syllabus was posted under that division.
(3) Any syllabus posted under division (B)(2) or (3) of this section shall remain posted on
the state institution's web site for not less than two years after it was first posted.
(4) To the extent practicable, each state institution shall ensure that the most recently
updated syllabus for each undergraduate course it offers for college credit is posted in accordance
with division (B) of this section.
(D) Divisions (B) and (C) of this section do not apply to a college course that is offered
through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code,
delivered in a secondary school, and taught by a high school teacher.
(E) Each state institution shall designate an administrator to implement the institution's
responsibilities under this section. The administrator may assign duties for that purpose to one or
more administrative employees.
(F) Each state institution shall prepare a written report regarding its compliance with the

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
11
requirements under this section for the chancellor of higher education in accordance with guidelines
established under section 3345.0219 of the Revised Code.
The chancellor shall prepare a report that includes each report received from a state
institution under this division.
(G) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a publicly available syllabus to
include the location or time of day at which a course is being held.
Sec. 3345.0216. (A) Each state institution of higher education, as defined in section
3345.011 of the Revised Code, shall incorporate all of the following statements into a statement of
commitment:
(1) The institution declares that it will educate students by means of free, open, and rigorous
intellectual inquiry to seek the truth.
(2) The institution declares that its duty is to equip students with the opportunity to develop
the intellectual skills they need to reach their own, informed conclusions.
(3) The institution declares its commitment to not requiring, favoring, disfavoring, or
prohibiting speech or lawful assembly.
(4) The institution declares it is committed to create a community dedicated to an ethic of
civil and free inquiry, which respects the autonomy of each member, supports individual capacities
for growth, and tolerates the differences in opinion that naturally occur in a public higher education
community.
(5) The institution declares that its duty is to treat all faculty, staff, and students as
individuals, to hold them to equal standards, and to provide them equality of opportunity, with
regard to those individuals' race, ethnicity, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or
gender expression.
(B) Each state institution of higher education shall prominently post the statement of
commitment developed under this section on its publicly accessible web site and alongside the state
institution's mission statement in any place in which the mission statement appears, including when
it is published or posted. Each institution shall include the statement of commitment in any
solicitations and offers of admission to students and any offers of employment to faculty.
Sec. 3345.0217. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Controversial belief or policy" means any belief or policy that is the subject of political
controversy, including issues such as climate policies, electoral politics, foreign policy, diversity,
equity, and inclusion programs, immigration policy, marriage, or abortion.
(2) "Intellectual diversity" means multiple, divergent, and varied perspectives on an
extensive range of public policy issues.
(3) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of
the Revised Code.
(B) Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this section, the board of trustees of
each state institution of higher education shall adopt and the institution shall enforce a policy that

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
12
requires the institution to do all of the following:
(1)(a) Prohibit all of the following:
(i) Any orientation or training course regarding diversity, equity, and inclusion, unless the
institution submits a written request for an exception to the chancellor of higher education because
the institution determines the orientation or training course is exempt from that prohibition because
all aspects of the orientation or course are required to do any of the following:
(I) Comply with state and federal laws or regulations;
(II) Comply with state or federal professional licensure requirements;
(III) Obtain or retain accreditation.
The exception request shall include an explanation of the circumstances and the effort made
by the institution to comply with division (B)(1)(a)(i) of this section.
(ii) The continuation of existing diversity, equity, and inclusion offices or departments;
(iii) Establishing new diversity, equity, and inclusion offices or departments;
(iv) Using diversity, equity, and inclusion in job descriptions;
(v) Contracting with consultants or third-parties whose role is or would be to promote
admissions, hiring, or promotion on the basis of race, ethnicity, religion, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, or gender expression;
(vi) The establishment of any new institutional scholarships that use diversity, equity, and
inclusion in any manner. For any institutional scholarships existing on the effective date of this
section, a state institution shall, to the extent possible, eliminate diversity, equity, and inclusion
requirements. If the state institution is unable to do so because of donor requirements, the institution
may continue to offer those institutional scholarships. However, the state institution shall not accept
any additional funds for the operation of institutional scholarships that have diversity, equity, and
inclusion requirements.
(b) A state institution shall not replace any orientation, training, office, or position
designated for the purpose of diversity, equity, and inclusion that is prohibited under this division
with an orientation, training, office, or position under a different designation that serves the same or
similar purposes, or that uses the same or similar means.
(c) In the event that the requirements to obtain a research grant conflict with the prohibitions
listed under division (B)(1)(a) of this section, a state institution shall endeavor, to the extent
possible, to comply with division (B)(1)(a) of this section while retaining eligibility for the research
grant, including by consulting with legal counsel. A state institution that is unable to comply with
division (B)(1)(a) of this section with respect to a research grant shall submit a written request for an
exception to the chancellor. The exception request shall include an explanation of the circumstances
and the effort made by the state institution to comply with division (B)(1)(a) of this section while
retaining eligibility for the research grant.
(d) Divisions (B)(1)(a) and (c) of this section do not apply to agreements or contracts
regarding any research grants entered into prior to the effective date of this section. Divisions (B)(1)

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
13
(a) and (c) of this section apply to any renewal of such agreements or contracts occurring on or after
the effective date of this section.
(2) Affirm and declare that its primary function is to practice, or support the practice,
discovery, improvement, transmission, and dissemination of knowledge and citizenship education by
means of research, teaching, discussion, and debate;
(3) Affirm and declare that, to fulfill the function described in division (B)(2) of this section,
the state institution shall ensure the fullest degree of intellectual diversity;
(4) Affirm and declare that faculty and staff shall allow and encourage students to reach their
own conclusions about all controversial beliefs or policies and shall not seek to indoctrinate any
social, political, or religious point of view;
(5) Demonstrate intellectual diversity for course approval, approval of courses to satisfy
general education requirements, student course evaluations, common reading programs, annual
reviews, strategic goals for each department, and student learning outcomes.
Divisions (B)(2) to (5) of this section do not apply to the exercise of professional judgment
about how to accomplish intellectual diversity within an academic discipline, unless that exercise is
misused to constrict intellectual diversity.
(6) Declare that it will not endorse or oppose, as an institution, any controversial belief or
policy, except on matters that directly impact the institution's funding or mission of discovery,
improvement, and dissemination of knowledge. The institution may also endorse the congress of the
United States when it establishes a state of armed hostility against a foreign power.
This division does not include the recognition of national and state holidays, support for the
Constitution and laws of the United States or the state of Ohio, or the display of the American or
Ohio flag.
(7) Affirm and declare that the state institution will not encourage, discourage, require, or
forbid students, faculty, or administrators to endorse, assent to, or publicly express a given ideology,
political stance, or view of a social policy, nor will the institution require students to do any of those
things to obtain an undergraduate or post-graduate degree.
Divisions (B)(6) and (7) of this section do not apply to the exercise of professional judgment
about whether to endorse the consensus or foundational beliefs of an academic discipline, unless that
exercise is misused to take an action prohibited in division (B)(6) of this section.
(8) Prohibit political and ideological litmus tests in all hiring, promotion, and admissions
decisions, including diversity statements and any other requirement that applicants describe their
commitment to any ideology, principle, concept, or formulation that requires commitment to any
controversial belief or policy;
(9) Affirm and declare that no hiring, promotion, or admissions process or decision shall
encourage, discourage, require, or forbid students, faculty, or administrators to endorse, assent to, or
publicly express a given ideology or political stance;
(10) Affirm and declare that the state institution will not use a diversity statement or any

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
14
other assessment of an applicant's political or ideological views in any hiring, promotions, or
admissions process or decision;
(11) Affirm and declare that no process or decision regulating conditions of work or study,
such as committee assignments, course scheduling, or workload adjustment policies, shall
encourage, discourage, require, or forbid students, faculty, or administrators to endorse, assent to, or
publicly express a given ideology or political stance;
(12) Affirm and declare that the state institution will seek out invited speakers who have
diverse ideological or political views;
(13) Post prominently on its web site a complete list of all speaker fees, honoraria, and other
emoluments in excess of five hundred dollars for events that are sponsored by the state institution.
That information shall be all of the following:
(a) Accessible from the main page of the institution's web site by use of not more than three
links;
(b) Searchable by keywords and phrases;
(c) Accessible to the public without requiring user registration of any kind.
(C) Each state institution of higher education shall respond to complaints from any student,
student group, or faculty member about an alleged violation of the prohibitions and requirements
included in the policy adopted under this section using the process established under division (C) of
section 3345.0215 of the Revised Code.
(D)(1) Nothing in this section prohibits faculty or students from classroom instruction,
discussion, or debate, so long as faculty members allow students to express intellectual diversity.
(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a state institution of higher education from complying
with any state or federal law to provide disability services or to permit student organizations,
including fraternities and sororities.
(E) The general assembly may withhold or reduce any state operating subsidy payments,
state capital improvement funds, or other state appropriation to a state institution of higher education
if the general assembly determines the institution has failed to comply with the requirements
established under this section.
Sec. 3345.0218. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Intellectual diversity" has the same meaning as in section 3345.0217 of the Revised
Code.
(2) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of
the Revised Code.
(B) Each state institution of higher education shall respond to complaints regarding any
administrator, faculty member, staff, or student who interferes with the intellectual diversity rights,
prescribed under section 3345.0217 of the Revised Code, of another using the process established
under division (C) of section 3345.0215 of the Revised Code.
(C) Each state institution shall inform all of its students and employees of the protections

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
15
afforded to them under section 3345.0217 of the Revised Code and any policies it has adopted to put
them into practice, including by providing the information to new employees and to each student
during any new student orientation the institution offers.
(D) Each state institution shall comply with any reporting guidelines established by the
chancellor under section 3345.0219 of the Revised Code regarding any violations of the intellectual
diversity rights prescribed under section 3345.0217 of the Revised Code by any individual under the
institution's jurisdiction and any consequent disciplinary sanctions issued for that violation.
Sec. 3345.0219. Each state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of
the Revised Code, shall comply with guidelines established by the chancellor of higher education
when the institution adopts policies or issues reports under sections 3345.029, 3345.0217,
3345.0218, 3345.452, 3345.453, 3345.454, 3345.591, 3345.80, and 3345.88 of the Revised Code.
The guidelines shall address the form and manner by which the state institution shall submit a policy
or report to the chancellor when the institution is required to do so by one of those sections. The
chancellor shall post each such policy or report that the chancellor receives on the chancellor's
publicly accessible web site.
Sec. 3345.382. (A) As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" has the
same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code.
(B) Each state institution of higher education shall develop a course with not fewer than
three credit hours in the subject area of American civic literacy. The course shall include a study of
the American economic system and capitalism. The course shall comply with the criteria, policies,
and procedures established under section 3333.16 of the Revised Code. The course may be offered
under the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code. The
course shall, at a minimum, require each student to read all the following:
(1) The entire Constitution of the United States;
(2) The entire Declaration of Independence;
(3) A minimum of five essays in their entirety from the Federalist Papers. The essays shall
be selected by the department chair.
(4) The entire Emancipation Proclamation;
(5) The entire Gettysburg Address;
(6) The entire Letter from Birmingham Jail written by Dr. Martin Luther King Jr;
(7) The writings of Adam Smith, including a study of the principles written in The Wealth of
Nations.
Any student who takes the course shall be required to pass a cumulative final examination at
the conclusion of the course that assesses student proficiency about the documents described in
divisions (B)(1) to (7) of this section.
Each state institution of higher education board of trustees shall adopt a resolution approving
a plan to offer the course developed under this section. Each state institution shall submit that plan to
the chancellor of higher education. The chancellor shall review and approve each plan. Prior to

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
16
approving a plan, the chancellor may require a state institution to revise the plan and the course.
(C) Beginning with students who graduate from a state institution of higher education in the
spring semester, or equivalent quarter, of the 2029-2030 academic year, no state institution of higher
education shall grant a bachelor's degree to any student unless the student completes a course
described in division (B) of this section. A state institution may require students to complete the
course as part of the institution's general education courses of study.
(D) The president of a state institution of higher education, or the president's designee, may
exempt a student from the requirement to complete a course described in division (B) of this section,
if the president or designee determines that the student has completed at least one of the following:
(1) A course offered under the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365.
of the Revised Code that satisfies the content requirements described in division (B) of this section
and is approved by the chancellor;
(2) An advanced placement course and examination that satisfy the content requirements
described in division (B) of this section and are approved by the chancellor, and the student receives
a score of three or higher on that examination;
(3) At least three credit hours, or the equivalent, in a course in the subject area of American
history or American government.
(E) This section does not apply to associate's degree programs.
Sec. 3345.45. (A) On or before January 1, 1994, the The chancellor of higher education
jointly with all state universities institutions of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of
the Revised Code, shall develop standards for instructional workloads for full-time and part-time
faculty in keeping with the universities' institutions' missions and with special emphasis on the
undergraduate learning experience. The standards shall contain clear guidelines for institutions to
determine a range of acceptable undergraduate teaching by faculty.
(B) On or before June 30, 1994, the The board of trustees of each state university institution
of higher education shall take formal action to adopt a faculty workload policy consistent with the
standards developed under this section. Notwithstanding section 4117.08 of the Revised Code, the
policies adopted under this section are not appropriate subjects for collective bargaining.
Notwithstanding division (A) of section 4117.10 of the Revised Code, any policy adopted under this
section by a board of trustees prevails over any conflicting provisions of any collective bargaining
agreement between an employees organization and that board of trustees.
(C)(1) The board of trustees of each state university institution of higher education shall
review the university's institution's policy on faculty tenure and update that policy to promote
excellence in instruction, research, service, or commercialization, or any combination thereof.
(2) Beginning on July 1, 2018, as As a condition for a state university institution of higher
education to receive any state funds for research that are allocated to the department of higher
education under the appropriation line items referred to as either "research incentive third frontier
fund" or "research incentive third frontier-tax," the chancellor shall require the university institution

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
17
to include multiple pathways for faculty tenure, one of which may be a commercialization pathway,
in its policy.
(D)(1) At least once every five years, each state institution of higher education shall update
its faculty workload policy and submit the policy to the chancellor. The updated policies shall be
approved by the state institution's board of trustees each time it is submitted to the chancellor.
(2) Each state institution of higher education's faculty workload policy shall include all of
the following:
(a) An objective and numerically defined teaching workload expectation based on credit
hours as defined in 34 C.F.R. 600.2;
(b) A definition of all faculty workload elements in terms of credit hours as defined in 34
CFR 600.2 with a full-time workload minimum standard established by the board of trustees and
made publicly accessible on the state institution's web site;
(c) A definition of justifiable credit hour equivalents for activities other than teaching,
including research, clinical care, administration, service, and other activities as determined by the
state institution of higher education;
(d) Administrative action that a state institution of higher education may take, including
censure, remedial training, for-cause termination, or other disciplinary action, regardless of tenure
status, if a faculty member fails to comply with the policy's requirements. Termination under these
circumstances requires the recommendation of the dean, provost, or equivalent official, concurrence
of the state institution of higher education's president, and approval of the state institution of higher
education's board of trustees.
Sec. 3345.451. (A) As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" has the
same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code.
(B) The chancellor of higher education shall develop a minimum set of standard questions
for use by state institutions of higher education in student evaluations of faculty members. The
questions shall include the following:
"Does the faculty member create a classroom atmosphere free of political, racial, gender, and
religious bias?"
(C) Each state institution of higher education shall establish a written system of faculty
evaluations completed by students with a focus on teaching effectiveness and student learning. Each
state institution shall include in its student evaluations of faculty the minimum set of standard
questions developed by the chancellor in division (B) of this section.
(D) Each state institution of higher education shall establish a written system of peer
evaluations for faculty members with emphasis placed on the faculty member's professional
development regarding the faculty member's teaching responsibilities.
Sec. 3345.452. (A) As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" has the
same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code.
(B) The board of trustees of each state institution of higher education shall adopt a faculty

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
18
annual performance evaluation policy and submit the policy to the chancellor of higher education.
Each policy must contain an appeals process for faculty to appeal the final evaluation. Each state
institution's board of trustees shall review and update its policy every five years.
(C) Each state institution of higher education shall conduct an annual evaluation for each
full-time faculty member who it directly compensates.
(D) Each faculty annual performance evaluation shall meet all of the following:
(1) The evaluation is comprehensive and includes standardized, objective, and measurable
performance metrics.
(2) The evaluation includes an assessment of performance for each of the following areas
that the faculty member has spent at least five per cent of their annual work time on over the
preceding year:
(a) Teaching;
(b) Research;
(c) Service;
(d) Clinical care;
(e) Administration;
(f) Other categories, as determined by the state institution of higher education.
(3) The evaluation includes a summary assessment of the performance areas listed in
division (D)(2) of this section including the parameters "exceeds performance expectations," "meets
performance expectations," or "does not meet performance expectations."
(4) Student evaluations conducted pursuant to section 3345.451 of the Revised Code account
for at least twenty-five per cent of the teaching area component of the evaluation.
(5) The evaluation establishes a projected work effort distribution for the faculty member for
the next year which shall be used during the next year's evaluation. The distribution shall be
compliant with the state institution's established workload policies adopted under section 3345.45 of
the Revised Code and shall receive approval from the dean of faculty or the equivalent.
(E) Evaluations shall be conducted by the department chairperson or equivalent
administrator, reviewed and approved or disapproved by the dean, and submitted to the provost for
review. If there is disagreement between the chairperson and dean, the provost shall have final
decision authority.
Sec. 3345.453. This section applies only to state institutions of higher education that have
tenured faculty members.
(A) As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in
section 3345.011 of the Revised Code.
(B) The board of trustees of each state institution of higher education shall adopt a post-
tenure review policy and submit the policy to the chancellor of higher education. Each policy must
contain an appeals process for tenured faculty whose post-tenure review process results in a
recommendation for administrative action pursuant to division (G) of this section. Each state

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
19
institution's board of trustees shall update the post-tenure review policy every five years.
(C) A state institution of higher education shall conduct a post-tenure review if a tenured
faculty member receives a "does not meet performance expectations" evaluation within the same
evaluative category for a minimum of two of the past three consecutive years on the faculty
member's annual performance evaluation conducted pursuant to section 3345.452 of the Revised
Code.
(D) A state institution of higher education shall subject any faculty member who maintains
tenure after a post-tenure review and receives an additional "does not meet performance
expectations" assessment on any area of the faculty member's annual performance evaluation in the
subsequent two years to an additional post-tenure review.
(E) The department chairperson, dean of faculty, or provost of a state institution of higher
education may require an immediate and for cause post-tenure review at any time for a faculty
member who has a documented and sustained record of significant underperformance outside of the
faculty member's annual performance evaluation. For this purpose, for cause shall not be based on a
faculty member's allowable expression of academic freedom as defined by the state institution of
higher education or Ohio law.
(F) The state institution of higher education's post-tenure review due process period, from
beginning to end, shall not exceed six months, except that a one-time two-month extension may be
granted by the state institution's president.
(G) The state institution of higher education's provost shall submit a recommended outcome
of the post-tenure review process to the institution's entity that is responsible for the final decision of
post-tenure review pursuant to the institution's policy. The administrative action that a state
institution of higher education may take includes censure, remedial training, or for-cause
termination, regardless of tenure status, and any other action permitted by the institution's post-
tenure review policy.
Sec. 3345.454. This section applies only to state institutions of higher education that have
tenured faculty members.
(A) As used in this section:
(1) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of
the Revised Code.
(2) "Retrenchment" means a process by which a state institution of higher education reduces
programs or services, thus resulting in a temporary suspension or permanent separation of one or
more institution faculty, to account for a reduction in student population or overall funding, a change
to institutional missions or programs, or other fiscal pressures or emergencies facing the institution.
(B) In addition to the policies described in sections 3345.45 to 3345.453 of the Revised
Code, each state institution of higher education board of trustees shall develop policies on tenure and
retrenchment. Each state institution shall submit those policies to the chancellor of higher education.
Each state institution's board of trustees shall update those policies every five years.

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
20
(C) A state institution of higher education shall eliminate any undergraduate degree program
it offers if the institution confers an average of fewer than five degrees in that program annually over
any three-year period. A state institution shall not consider any academic year prior to the first
academic year in which an undergraduate degree is conferred in determining whether this division
applies to the program offering that degree.
The chancellor may grant a waiver to a state institution for a program to which this division
applies. State institutions shall appeal for a waiver in a form and manner determined by the
chancellor. If the chancellor grants a waiver to a state institution, the chancellor shall establish terms
under which the state institution may conditionally continue the program, including whether the
program is eligible to be supported by state share of instruction funds.
Sec. 3345.455. With respect to a collective bargaining agreement entered into on or after the
effective date of this section, both of the following apply to the standards, policies, and systems
adopted under sections 3345.45 to 3345.454 of the Revised Code:
(A) Notwithstanding section 4117.08 of the Revised Code, the standards, policies, and
systems are not appropriate subjects for collective bargaining.
(B) Notwithstanding division (A) of section 4117.10 of the Revised Code, the standards,
policies, and systems prevail over any conflicting provision of a collective bargaining agreement.
Sec. 3345.456. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of
the Revised Code.
(2) "Retrenchment" has the same meaning as in section 3345.454 of the Revised Code.
(B) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 3345.454 or 3345.455 of the Revised
Code, a state institution of higher education that is a party to a collective bargaining agreement in
effect on the effective date of this section containing a provision regarding retrenchment shall only
continue to bargain over retrenchment policies for a new or renewed collective bargaining
agreement with respect to institution faculty that have at least thirty years, but not more than thirty-
five years, of service in one of the state retirement systems at the time of any retrenchment
determination.
(C) Nothing in this section prohibits a faculty member from accepting any separation
incentive that may otherwise be offered by a state institution of higher education, regardless of
whether the incentive is contained in a collective bargaining agreement.
Sec. 3345.591. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "People's Republic of China" means the government of China, the Chinese Communist
Party, the People's Liberation Army, or any other extension of, or entity affiliated with, the
government of China.
(2) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of
the Revised Code.
(B) No state institution of higher education shall accept gifts, donations, or contributions

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
21
from the People's Republic of China or any organization the institution reasonably suspects is acting
on behalf of the People's Republic of China.
Nothing in this section prohibits a state institution of higher education from accepting
payments from Chinese citizens related to instructional fees, general fees, special fees, cost of
instruction, or educational expenses or donations from the institution's alumni.
Nothing in this section prohibits a state institution of higher education from receiving
philanthropic or unrestricted grants so long as it maintains the structural safeguard requirements
provided for in division (E) of this section.
(C) Each state institution shall submit to the chancellor of higher education a copy of the
report it submits to the United States department of education pursuant to 20 U.S.C. 1011(f).
(D) Upon request, the chancellor shall make any information reported under division (C) of
this section available to any member of the general assembly.
(E) A state institution shall notify the chancellor of any new or renewed academic
partnership with an academic or research institution located in China. A state institution shall only
enter into a new or renewed academic partnership with an academic or research institution located in
China if the state institution maintains sufficient structural safeguards to protect the state institution's
intellectual property, the security of the state of Ohio, and the national security interests of the
United States. The safeguards shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(1) Compliance with all federal requirements, including the requirements of federal research
sponsors and federal export control agencies, including regulations regarding international traffic in
arms and export administration regulations, and economic and trade sanctions administered by the
federal office of foreign assets control;
(2) Annual formal institution-level programs for faculty on conflicts of interest and conflicts
of commitment;
(3) A formalized foreign visitor process and uniform visiting scholar agreement.
(F) The auditor of state shall audit the safeguards implemented by state institutions of higher
education under division (E) of this section in the course of a normal audit conducted under section
117.46 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 3345.80. (A) As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" and "state
university" have the same meanings as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code.
(B) For each biennial main operating appropriations bill and capital appropriations bill, each
state institution of higher education shall prepare, in accordance with guidelines established under
section 3345.0219 of the Revised Code, a rolling five-year summary of its institutional costs to be
considered by the general assembly when evaluating operating and capital project funding. The
chancellor shall submit a report including each state institution's five-year institutional cost
summaries to the general assembly under section 101.68 of the Revised Code.
(C) Each state institution of higher education's five-year institutional cost summary shall
consist of the following categories:

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
22
(1) All costs related to student instruction, including instructor salaries, benefits, and related
operating costs;
(2) All general staff costs related to maintenance, grounds, utilities, food service, and other
areas as determined by the institution;
(3) All other costs for staff, including academic administrators, counseling, financial aid
assistance, healthcare services, and housing management.
(D) Each of the categories presented in the five-year institutional cost summary shall include
all of the following:
(1) A detailed breakdown of annual costs and employee headcounts;
(2) A complete accounting of all spending on diversity, equity, and inclusion, or related
subjects;
(3) An annual count of all faculty, administration, and employees.
(E) The chancellor shall consult with state institutions of higher education to develop a
standardized reporting format for the institutional cost summaries and a uniform approach to
completing the categories required in division (C) of this section.
(F) During the general assembly's consideration of the main operating appropriations and
capital appropriations bills, if requested by the chairperson of the senate or house committee that
considers higher education legislation, the president of each state university and the chancellor of
higher education shall present in the appropriate hearings conducted by that committee to provide
commentary on trends, potential justifications, or other explanations regarding the university's five-
year summary of institutional costs.
(G) Prior to the enactment of the main operating appropriations and capital appropriations
bills, the chancellor shall create and present to the general assembly an aggregation report
summarizing the total institutional costs for state universities and community colleges separately.
Sec. 3345.88. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Position, policy, program, and activity" includes all of the following:
(a) All forms of employment, including staff positions, internships, and work studies;
(b) All policies, including mission statements, hiring policies, promotion policies, and tenure
policies;
(c) All programs and positions, including deanships, provostships, offices, programs,
programs presented by residence halls, and committees;
(d) All activities, including those conducted by the administrative units of orientation, first-
year experience, student life, and residential life.
(2) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of
the Revised Code.
(B) With respect to every position, policy, program, and activity, each state institution of
higher education shall do both of the following:
(1) Treat all faculty, staff, and students as individuals, hold every individual to equal

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
23
standards, and provide those individuals with equality of opportunity, with regard to those
individuals' race, ethnicity, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression;
(2) Provide no advantage or disadvantage to faculty, staff, or students on the basis of race,
ethnicity, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression in admissions,
hiring, promotion, tenuring, or workplace conditions.
(C) No state institution of higher education shall provide or require training for any
administrator, teacher, staff member, or employee that advocates or promotes any of the following
concepts:
(1) One race or sex is inherently superior to another race or sex.
(2) An individual, by virtue of his or her race or sex, is inherently racist, sexist, or
oppressive, whether consciously or unconsciously.
(3) An individual should be discriminated against or receive adverse treatment solely or
partly because of the individual's race.
(4) Members of one race cannot nor should not attempt to treat others without respect to
race.
(5) An individual's moral standing or worth is necessarily determined by the individual's race
or sex.
(6) An individual, by virtue of the individual's race or sex, bears responsibility for actions
committed in the past by other members of the same race or sex.
(7) An individual should feel discomfort, guilt, anguish, or any other form of psychological
distress on account of his or her race or sex.
(8) Meritocracy or traits such as hard work ethic are racist or sexist, or were created by
members of a particular race to oppress members of another race.
(9) Fault, blame, or bias should be assigned to a race or sex, or to members of a race or sex
because of their race or sex.
Division (C) of this section shall not be construed to preclude a state institution of higher
education from providing or facilitating continuing education that complies with this division's
requirements to public safety officers.
(D) Each state institution of higher education shall implement a range of disciplinary
sanctions for any administrator, teacher, staff member, or employee who authorizes or engages in a
training prohibited in division (C) of this section.
(E) Each state institution of higher education shall issue a report in accordance with
guidelines established under section 3345.0219 of the Revised Code regarding each of the following:
(1) All violations of division (D) of this section committed by anyone under the institution's
jurisdiction and of all consequent disciplinary sanctions;
(2) Statistics on the academic qualifications of accepted and matriculating students,
disaggregated by race and sex. The statistics shall include information correlating students' academic
qualifications and retention rates, disaggregated by race and sex.

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
24
(F) Each state institution of higher education shall prohibit all policies designed explicitly to
segregate faculty, staff, or students based on those individuals' race, ethnicity, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, or gender expression in credit-earning classroom settings, formal
orientation ceremonies, and formal graduation ceremonies.
(G) Each state institution of higher education shall respond to complaints from any student,
student group, or faculty member about an alleged violation of the prohibitions and requirements
under this section by an employee of the state institution of higher education using the process
established under division (C) of section 3345.0215 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 3350.10. (A) There is hereby created the northeast Ohio medical university. The
principal goal of the medical university shall be to collaborate with the university of Akron,
Cleveland state university, Kent state university, and Youngstown state university to graduate
physicians oriented to the practice of medicine at the community level, especially family physicians.
To accomplish this goal, the medical university may incorporate in the clinical experience provided
its students the several community hospitals in the cities and areas served by the medical university;
utilize practicing physicians as teachers; and to the fullest extent possible utilize the basic science
capabilities of the university of Akron, Cleveland state university, Kent state university, and
Youngstown state universityThe government of northeast Ohio medical university is vested in a
board of eleven trustees, who shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the
senate pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section.
(1) Until December 22, 2008, the government of the northeast Ohio medical university is
vested in a nine-member board of trustees consisting of the presidents of the university of Akron,
Kent state university, and Youngstown state university; one member each of the boards of trustees of
the university of Akron, Kent state university, and Youngstown state university, to be appointed by
their respective boards of trustees for a term of six years ending on the first day of May or until the
trustee's term on the respective university board of trustees expires, whichever occurs first; and one
person each to be appointed by the boards of trustees of the university of Akron, Kent state
university, and Youngstown state university, for a term of nine years ending on the first day of May;
except that the term of those first appointed by the several boards of trustees shall expire on the first
day of May next following their appointment. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the
manner provided for original appointment. The trustees shall receive no compensation for their
services but shall be paid their reasonable necessary expenses while engaged in the discharge of
their official duties. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.
(2) Beginning December 22, 2008, the government of the northeast Ohio medical university
is vested in a board of eleven trustees, who shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and
consent of the senate. Two of the trustees shall be current students of the medical university, and
their selection and terms shall be in accordance with division (B) of this section. Except For trustees
appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except as provided in division (A)(3) of this section and except for
the student members, terms of office shall be for nine years. For trustees appointed on or after July

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
25
1, 2025, except for the student members, terms of office shall be for six years. Each trustee shall
hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the trustee was
appointed. Any trustee appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for
which the trustee's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of such term. Any
trustee shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the trustee's term until the
trustee's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. No
person who has served a full nine-year term or more than six years of such a term shall be eligible
for reappointment until a period of four years has elapsed since the last day of the term for which the
person previously served. The trustees shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be
paid their reasonable necessary expenses while engaged in the discharge of their official duties. A
majority of the board constitutes a quorum.
(3) Not later than December 22, 2008, the governor, with the advice and consent of the
senate, shall appoint the two student trustees and successors for the trustees serving under division
(A)(1) of this section. Except for the student trustees, who shall serve terms pursuant to division (B)
of this section, the initial terms of office for trustees appointed under division (A)(2) of this section
shall be as follows: one term ending September 23, 2009; one term ending September 23, 2010; one
term ending September 23, 2011; one term ending September 23, 2012; one term ending September
23, 2013; one term ending September 23, 2014; one term ending September 23, 2015; one term
ending September 23, 2016; one term ending September 23, 2017. Thereafter, for trustees appointed
prior to July 1, 2025, terms of office shall be for nine years, as provided in division (A)(2) of this
section. For trustees appointed on or after July 1, 2025, terms of office shall be for six years, as
provided in division (A)(2) of this section.
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of the northeast Ohio medical university
have no voting power on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the
board in determining whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend
executive sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the
governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected
pursuant to a procedure adopted by the university's student governments and approved by the
university's board of trustees. The initial term of office of one of the student members shall
commence December 22, 2008, and shall expire on June 30, 2009, and the initial term of office of
the other student member shall commence December 22, 2008, and shall expire on June 30, 2010.
Thereafter, terms of office of student members shall be for two years, each term ending on the same
day of the same month of the year as the term it succeeds. In the event that a student member cannot
fulfill a two-year term, a replacement shall be selected to fill the unexpired term in the same manner
used to make the original selection.
Sec. 3352.01. (A) There is hereby created a state university to be known as "Wright state
university." The government of Wright state university is vested in a board of eleven trustees, who
shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. Two of the trustees

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
26
shall be students at Wright state university, and their selection and terms shall be in accordance with
division (B) of this section. Except For trustees appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except for the terms
of student members, terms of office shall be for nine years, commencing on the first day of July and
ending on the thirtieth day of June. For trustees appointed on or after July 1, 2025, except for the
terms of student members, terms of office shall be for six years, commencing on the first day of July
and ending on the thirtieth day of June. Each trustee shall hold office from the date of appointment
until the end of the term for which the trustee was appointed. Any trustee appointed to fill a vacancy
occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the trustee's predecessor was appointed shall
hold office for the remainder of such term. Any trustee shall continue in office subsequent to the
expiration date of the trustee's term until the trustee's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty
days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. No person who has served a full nine-year term or more
than six years of such a term shall be eligible for reappointment until a period of four years has
elapsed since the last day of the term for which the person previously served. The trustees shall
receive no compensation for their services but shall be paid their reasonable necessary expenses
while engaged in the discharge of their official duties. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of Wright state university have no voting
power on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in
determining whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive
sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the
advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected pursuant to a procedure
adopted by the university's student governments and approved by the university's board of trustees.
The initial term of office of one of the student members shall commence on July 1, 1988, and shall
expire on June 30, 1989, and the initial term of office of the other student member shall commence
on July 1, 1988, and shall expire on June 30, 1990. Thereafter, terms of office of student members
shall be for two years, each term ending on the same day of the same month of the year as the term it
succeeds. In the event that a student member cannot fulfill a two-year term, a replacement shall be
selected to fill the unexpired term in the same manner used to make the original selection.
Sec. 3356.01. (A) There is hereby created Youngstown state university. The government of
Youngstown state university is vested in a board of eleven trustees, who shall be appointed by the
governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. Two of the trustees shall be students at
Youngstown state university, and their selection and terms shall be in accordance with division (B)
of this section. Except For trustees appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except for the terms of student
members, terms of office shall be for nine years, commencing on the second day of May and ending
on the first day of May. For trustees appointed on or after July 1, 2025, except for the terms of
student members, terms of office shall be for six years, commencing on the second day of May and
ending on the first day of May. Each trustee shall hold office from the date of appointment until the
end of the term for which the trustee was appointed. Any trustee appointed to fill a vacancy
occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the trustee's predecessor was appointed shall

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
27
hold office for the remainder of such term. Any trustee shall continue in office subsequent to the
expiration date of the trustee's term until the trustee's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty
days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. No person who has served a full nine-year term or more
than six years of such a term shall be eligible to reappointment until a period of four years has
elapsed since the last day of the term for which the person previously served. The trustees shall
receive no compensation for their services but shall be paid their reasonable necessary expenses
while engaged in the discharge of their duties. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of Youngstown state university have no
voting power on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in
determining whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive
sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the
advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected pursuant to a procedure
adopted by the university's student governments and approved by the university's board of trustees.
The initial term of office of one of the student members shall commence on May 2, 1988, and shall
expire on May 1, 1989, and the initial term of office of the other student member shall commence on
May 2, 1988, and expire on May 1, 1990. Thereafter, terms of office of student members shall be for
two years, each term ending on the same day of the same month of the year as the term it succeeds.
In the event that a student member cannot fulfill a two-year term, a replacement shall be selected to
fill the unexpired term in the same manner used to make the original selection.
Sec. 3359.01. (A) There is hereby created a state university to be known as "The University
of Akron." The government of the university of Akron is vested in a board of eleven trustees who
shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. Two of the trustees
shall be students at the university of Akron, and their selection and terms shall be in accordance with
division (B) of this section. Except For trustees appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except for the terms
of student members, terms of office shall be for nine years, commencing on the second day of July
and ending on the first day of July. For trustees appointed on or after July 1, 2025, except for the
terms of student members, terms of office shall be for six years. Each trustee shall hold office from
the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the trustee was appointed. Any trustee
appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the trustee's
predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of such term. Any trustee shall
continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the trustee's term until the trustee's successor
takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. No person who has
served a full nine-year term or more than six years of such a term shall be eligible for reappointment
until a period of four years has elapsed since the last day of the term for which the person previously
served. The trustees shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be paid their
reasonable necessary expenses while engaged in the discharge of their official duties. A majority of
the board constitutes a quorum.
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of the university of Akron have no voting

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
28
power on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in
determining whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive
sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the
advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected pursuant to a procedure
adopted by the university's student governments and approved by the university's board of trustees.
The initial term of office of one of the student members shall commence on July 2, 1988, and shall
expire on July 1, 1989, and the initial term of office of the other student member shall commence on
July 2, 1988, and expire on July 1, 1990. Thereafter, terms of office of student members shall be for
two years, each term ending on the same day of the same month of the year as the term it succeeds.
In the event that a student member cannot fulfill a two-year term, a replacement shall be selected to
fill the unexpired term in the same manner used to make the original selection.
Sec. 3361.01. (A) There is hereby created a state university to be known as the "university of
Cincinnati." The government of the university of Cincinnati is vested in a board of eleven trustees
who shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Two of the
trustees shall be students at the university of Cincinnati, and their selection and terms shall be in
accordance with division (B) of this section. The terms of the first nine members of the board of
trustees shall commence upon the effective date of the transfer of assets of the state-affiliated
university of Cincinnati to the university of Cincinnati hereby created. One of such trustees shall be
appointed for a term ending on the first day of January occurring at least twelve months after such
date of transfer, and each of the other trustees shall be appointed for respective terms ending on each
succeeding first day of January, so that one term will expire on each first day of January after
expiration of the shortest term. Except For trustees appointed prior to July 1, 2025, except for the
two student trustees, each successor trustee shall be appointed for a term ending on the first day of
January, nine years from the expiration date of the term the trustee succeeds, except that any person
appointed to fill a vacancy shall be appointed to serve only for the unexpired term. For trustees
appointed on or after July 1, 2025, except for the two student trustees, each trustee shall be
appointed for a term ending on the first day of January, six years from the expiration date of the term
the trustee succeeds, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall be appointed to serve
only for the unexpired term.
Any trustee shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the trustee's term
until the trustee's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs
first.
No person who has served a full nine-year term or longer or more than six years of such a
term shall be eligible to reappointment until a period of four years has elapsed since the last day of
the term for which the person previously served.
The trustees shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be paid their
reasonable necessary expenses while engaged in the discharge of their official duties. A majority of
the board constitutes a quorum.

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
29
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of the university of Cincinnati have no
voting power on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in
determining whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive
sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the
advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected pursuant to a procedure
adopted by the university's student governments and approved by the university's board of trustees.
The initial term of office of one of the student members shall commence on May 14, 1988, and shall
expire on May 13, 1989, and the initial term of office of the other student member shall commence
on May 14, 1988, and expire on May 13, 1990. Thereafter, terms of office of student members shall
be for two years, each term ending on the same day of the same month of the year as the term it
succeeds. In the event that a student cannot fulfill a two-year term, a replacement shall be selected to
fill the unexpired term in the same manner used to make the original selection.
Sec. 3362.01. (A) There is hereby created a state university to be known as "Shawnee state
university." The government of Shawnee state university is vested in a board of eleven trustees who
shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Two of the trustees
shall be students at Shawnee state university, and their selection and terms shall be in accordance
with division (B) of this section. The remaining trustees shall be appointed as follows: one for a term
of one year, one for a term of two years, one for a term of three years, one for a term of four years,
one for a term of five years, one for a term of six years, one for a term of seven years, one for a term
of eight years, and one for a term of nine years. Thereafter, for trustees appointed prior to July 1,
2025, terms shall be for nine years. For trustees appointed on or after July 1, 2025, terms shall be for
six years. All terms of office shall commence on the first day of July and end on the thirtieth day of
June.
Each trustee shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for
which the trustee was appointed. Any trustee appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of the term for which the trustee's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the
remainder of such term. Any trustee shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the
trustee's term until the trustee's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed,
whichever occurs first. No person who has served a full nine-year term or more than six years of
such a term shall be eligible for reappointment until a period of four years has elapsed since the last
day of the term for which the person previously served.
The trustees shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be paid their
reasonable and necessary expenses while engaged in the discharge of their official duties.
A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.
(B) The student members of the board of trustees of Shawnee state university have no voting
power on the board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in
determining whether a quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive
sessions of the board. The student members of the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
30
advice and consent of the senate, from a group of five candidates selected pursuant to a procedure
adopted by the university's student governments and approved by the university's board of trustees.
The initial term of office of one of the student members shall commence on July 1, 1988, and shall
expire on June 30, 1989, and the initial term of office of the other student member shall commence
on July 1, 1988, and expire on June 30, 1990. Thereafter, terms of office of student members shall
be for two years, each term ending on the same day of the same month of the year as the term it
succeeds. In the event a student member cannot fulfill a two-year term, a replacement shall be
selected to fill the unexpired term in the same manner used to make the original selection.
Sec. 3364.01. (A) The university of Toledo, as authorized under former Chapter 3360. of the
Revised Code, and the medical university of Ohio at Toledo, as authorized under former sections
3350.01 to 3350.05 of the Revised Code, shall be combined as one state university to be known as
the "university of Toledo."
(B)(1) The government of the combined university of Toledo is vested in a board of trustees
which, except as prescribed in division (B)(2) of this section, shall be appointed by the governor
with the advice and consent of the senate. The initial board of trustees of the combined university
shall be as prescribed in division (B)(2) of this section. After the abolishment of offices as
prescribed in division (B)(2)(a) of this section, the board of trustees of the combined university shall
consist of nine voting members, who, if appointed prior to July 1, 2025, shall serve for terms of nine
years, or, if appointed on or after July 1, 2025, shall serve for terms of six years, and two nonvoting
members, who shall be students of the combined university and who shall serve for terms of two
years. Terms of office of trustees shall begin on the second day of July and end on the first day of
July.
(2) The initial board of trustees of the combined university shall consist of seventeen voting
members who are the eight members who made up the board of trustees of the medical university of
Ohio at Toledo prior to May 1, 2006, under former section 3350.01 of the Revised Code, and whose
terms would expire under that section after May 1, 2006; the eight voting members who made up the
board of trustees of the university of Toledo, under former section 3360.01 of the Revised Code, and
whose terms would expire under that section after July 1, 2006; and one additional member
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The terms of office,
abolishment of office, and succession of the voting members of the initial board shall be as
prescribed in division (B)(2)(a) of this section. The initial board also shall consist of two nonvoting
members who are students of the combined university, as prescribed in division (B)(2)(b) of this
section.
(a) The term of office of the voting member of the initial board of trustees of the combined
university who was not formerly a member of either the board of trustees of the medical university
of Ohio at Toledo or the board of trustees of the university of Toledo shall be for nine years,
beginning on July 2, 2006, and ending on July 1, 2015.
The terms of office of the sixteen other voting members of the initial board of trustees shall

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
31
expire on July 1 of the year they otherwise would expire under former section 3350.01 or 3360.01 of
the Revised Code.
The office of one voting member whose term expires on July 1, 2007, shall be abolished on
that date. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a successor to the
office of the other voting member whose term expires on that date to a nine-year term beginning on
July 2, 2007.
The office of one voting member whose term expires on July 1, 2008, shall be abolished on
that date. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a successor to the
office of the other voting member whose term expires on that date to a nine-year term beginning on
July 2, 2008.
The office of one voting member whose term expires on July 1, 2009, shall be abolished on
that date. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a successor to the
office of the other voting member whose term expires on that date to a nine-year term beginning on
July 2, 2009.
The office of one voting member whose term expires on July 1, 2010, shall be abolished on
that date. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a successor to the
office of the other voting member whose term expires on that date to a nine-year term beginning on
July 2, 2010.
The office of one voting member whose term expires on July 1, 2011, shall be abolished on
that date. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a successor to the
office of the other voting member whose term expires on that date to a nine-year term beginning on
July 2, 2011.
The office of one voting member whose term expires on July 1, 2012, shall be abolished on
that date. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a successor to the
office of the other voting member whose term expires on that date to a nine-year term beginning on
July 2, 2012.
The office of one voting member whose term expires on July 1, 2013, shall be abolished on
that date. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a successor to the
office of the other voting member whose term expires on that date to a nine-year term beginning on
July 2, 2013.
The office of one voting member whose term expires on July 1, 2014, shall be abolished on
that date. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a successor to the
office of the other voting member whose term expires on that date to a nine-year term beginning on
July 2, 2014.
The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a successor to the
office of the voting member whose term expires on July 1, 2015, to a nine-year term beginning on
July 2, 2015.
Thereafter the terms of office of all subsequent voting members of the board of trustees who

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
32
are appointed prior to July 1, 2025, shall be for nine years beginning on the second day of July and
ending on the first day of July. The terms of office for voting members of the board of trustees who
are appointed on or after July 1, 2025, shall be for six years beginning on the second day of July and
ending on the first day of July.
(b) One of the student members of the initial board of trustees shall be the student member of
the former university of Toledo board of trustees, appointed under former section 3360.01 of the
Revised Code, whose term would expire under that section on July 1, 2007. The term of that student
member shall expire on July 1, 2007. The other student member shall be a new appointee,
representing the portion of the combined university that made up the former medical university of
Ohio at Toledo, appointed to a two-year term beginning on July 2, 2006, and ending on July 1, 2008.
That student trustee shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate,
from a group of three candidates selected pursuant to a procedure adopted by the university's student
governments and approved by the university's board of trustees. Thereafter appointment and terms
of office of student members of the board of trustees shall be as prescribed by division (B)(3) of this
section.
(3) The student members of the board of trustees of the combined university shall be
appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, from a group of six candidates
selected pursuant to a procedure adopted by the university's student governments and approved by
the university's board of trustees. Terms of office of student members shall be for two years, each
term ending on the same day of the same month of the year as the term it succeeds. In the event that
a student member cannot fulfill a two-year term, a replacement shall be selected to fill the unexpired
term in the same manner used to make the original selection.
(4) Each trustee shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for
which the trustee was appointed. Any trustee appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration of the term for which the trustee's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the
remainder of such term. Any trustee shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the
trustee's term until the trustee's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed,
whichever occurs first.
(5) No person who has served as a voting member of the board of trustees for a full nine-
year term or more than six years of such a term and no person who is a voting member of the initial
board of trustees as prescribed in division (B)(2)(a) of this section is eligible for reappointment to
the board until a period of four years has elapsed since the last day of the term for which the person
previously served.
No person who served as a voting member of the board of trustees of the former university
of Toledo, as authorized under former Chapter 3360. of the Revised Code, for a full nine-year term
or more than six years of such a term, and no person who served on the board of trustees of the
former medical university of Ohio at Toledo, as authorized under former sections 3350.01 to
3350.05 of the Revised Code, for a full nine-year term or more than six years of such a term is

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
33
eligible for appointment to the board of trustees of the combined university until a period of four
years has elapsed since the last day of the term for which the person previously served.
(C) The trustees shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be paid their
reasonable necessary expenses while engaged in the discharge of their official duties. A majority of
the board constitutes a quorum. The student members of the board have no voting power on the
board. Student members shall not be considered as members of the board in determining whether a
quorum is present. Student members shall not be entitled to attend executive sessions of the board.
Sec. 4117.14. (A) The procedures contained in this section govern the settlement of disputes
between an exclusive representative and a public employer concerning the termination or
modification of an existing collective bargaining agreement or negotiation of a successor agreement,
or the negotiation of an initial collective bargaining agreement.
(B)(1) In those cases where there exists a collective bargaining agreement, any public
employer or exclusive representative desiring to terminate, modify, or negotiate a successor
collective bargaining agreement shall:
(a) Serve written notice upon the other party of the proposed termination, modification, or
successor agreement. The party must serve the notice not less than sixty days prior to the expiration
date of the existing agreement or, in the event the existing collective bargaining agreement does not
contain an expiration date, not less than sixty days prior to the time it is proposed to make the
termination or modifications or to make effective a successor agreement.
(b) Offer to bargain collectively with the other party for the purpose of modifying or
terminating any existing agreement or negotiating a successor agreement;
(c) Notify the state employment relations board of the offer by serving upon the board a
copy of the written notice to the other party and a copy of the existing collective bargaining
agreement.
(2) In the case of initial negotiations between a public employer and an exclusive
representative, where a collective bargaining agreement has not been in effect between the parties,
any party may serve notice upon the board and the other party setting forth the names and addresses
of the parties and offering to meet, for a period of ninety days, with the other party for the purpose of
negotiating a collective bargaining agreement.
If the settlement procedures specified in divisions (B), (C), and (D) of this section govern the
parties, where those procedures refer to the expiration of a collective bargaining agreement, it means
the expiration of the sixty-day period to negotiate a collective bargaining agreement referred to in
this subdivision, or in the case of initial negotiations, it means the ninety-day period referred to in
this subdivision.
(3) The parties shall continue in full force and effect all the terms and conditions of any
existing collective bargaining agreement, without resort to strike or lock-out, for a period of sixty
days after the party gives notice or until the expiration date of the collective bargaining agreement,
whichever occurs later, or for a period of ninety days where applicable.

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
34
(4) Upon receipt of the notice, the parties shall enter into collective bargaining.
(C) In the event the parties are unable to reach an agreement, they may submit, at any time
prior to forty-five days before the expiration date of the collective bargaining agreement, the issues
in dispute to any mutually agreed upon dispute settlement procedure which supersedes the
procedures contained in this section.
(1) The procedures may include:
(a) Conventional arbitration of all unsettled issues;
(b) Arbitration confined to a choice between the last offer of each party to the agreement as a
single package;
(c) Arbitration confined to a choice of the last offer of each party to the agreement on each
issue submitted;
(d) The procedures described in division (C)(1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section and including
among the choices for the arbitrator, the recommendations of the fact finder, if there are
recommendations, either as a single package or on each issue submitted;
(e) Settlement by a citizens' conciliation council composed of three residents within the
jurisdiction of the public employer. The public employer shall select one member and the exclusive
representative shall select one member. The two members selected shall select the third member
who shall chair the council. If the two members cannot agree upon a third member within five days
after their appointments, the board shall appoint the third member. Once appointed, the council shall
make a final settlement of the issues submitted to it pursuant to division (G) of this section.
(f) Any other dispute settlement procedure mutually agreed to by the parties.
(2) If, fifty days before the expiration date of the collective bargaining agreement, the parties
are unable to reach an agreement, any party may request the state employment relations board to
intervene. The request shall set forth the names and addresses of the parties, the issues involved, and,
if applicable, the expiration date of any agreement.
The board shall intervene and investigate the dispute to determine whether the parties have
engaged in collective bargaining.
If an impasse exists or forty-five days before the expiration date of the collective bargaining
agreement if one exists, the board shall appoint a mediator to assist the parties in the collective
bargaining process.
(3) Any time after the appointment of a mediator, either party may request the appointment
of a fact-finding panel. Within fifteen days after receipt of a request for a fact-finding panel, the
board shall appoint a fact-finding panel of not more than three members who have been selected by
the parties in accordance with rules established by the board, from a list of qualified persons
maintained by the board.
(a) The fact-finding panel shall, in accordance with rules and procedures established by the
board that include the regulation of costs and expenses of fact-finding, gather facts and make
recommendations for the resolution of the matter. The board shall by its rules require each party to

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
35
specify in writing the unresolved issues and its position on each issue to the fact-finding panel. The
fact-finding panel shall make final recommendations as to all the unresolved issues.
(b) The board may continue mediation, order the parties to engage in collective bargaining
until the expiration date of the agreement, or both.
(4) The following guidelines apply to fact-finding:
(a) The fact-finding panel may establish times and place of hearings which shall be, where
feasible, in the jurisdiction of the state.
(b) The fact-finding panel shall conduct the hearing pursuant to rules established by the
board.
(c) Upon request of the fact-finding panel, the board shall issue subpoenas for hearings
conducted by the panel.
(d) The fact-finding panel may administer oaths.
(e) The board shall prescribe guidelines for the fact-finding panel to follow in making
findings. In making its recommendations, the fact-finding panel shall take into consideration the
factors listed in divisions (G)(7)(a) to (f) of this section.
(f) The fact-finding panel may attempt mediation at any time during the fact-finding process.
From the time of appointment until the fact-finding panel makes a final recommendation, it shall not
discuss the recommendations for settlement of the dispute with parties other than the direct parties to
the dispute.
(5) The fact-finding panel, acting by a majority of its members, shall transmit its findings of
fact and recommendations on the unresolved issues to the public employer and employee
organization involved and to the board no later than fourteen days after the appointment of the fact-
finding panel, unless the parties mutually agree to an extension. The parties shall share the cost of
the fact-finding panel in a manner agreed to by the parties.
(6)(a) Not later than seven days after the findings and recommendations are sent, the
legislative body, by a three-fifths vote of its total membership, and in the case of the public
employee organization, the membership, by a three-fifths vote of the total membership, may reject
the recommendations; if neither rejects the recommendations, the recommendations shall be deemed
agreed upon as the final resolution of the issues submitted and a collective bargaining agreement
shall be executed between the parties, including the fact-finding panel's recommendations, except as
otherwise modified by the parties by mutual agreement. If either the legislative body or the public
employee organization rejects the recommendations, the board shall publicize the findings of fact
and recommendations of the fact-finding panel. The board shall adopt rules governing the
procedures and methods for public employees to vote on the recommendations of the fact-finding
panel.
(b) As used in division (C)(6)(a) of this section, "legislative body" means the controlling
board when the state or any of its agencies, authorities, commissions, boards, or other branch of
public employment is party to the fact-finding process.

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
36
(D) If the parties are unable to reach agreement within seven days after the publication of
findings and recommendations from the fact-finding panel or the collective bargaining agreement, if
one exists, has expired, then the:
(1) Public employees, who are members of a police or fire department, members of the state
highway patrol, deputy sheriffs, dispatchers employed by a police, fire, or sheriff's department or the
state highway patrol or civilian dispatchers employed by a public employer other than a police, fire,
or sheriff's department to dispatch police, fire, sheriff's department, or emergency medical or rescue
personnel and units, an exclusive nurse's unit, employees of Ohio deaf and blind education services,
employees of any public employee retirement system, corrections officers, guards at penal or mental
institutions, special police officers appointed in accordance with sections 5119.08 and 5123.13 of the
Revised Code, psychiatric attendants employed at mental health forensic facilities, youth leaders
employed at juvenile correctional facilities, or members of a law enforcement security force that is
established and maintained exclusively by a board of county commissioners and whose members are
employed by that board,prohibited from striking under this division shall submit the matter to a final
offer settlement procedure pursuant to a board order issued forthwith to the parties to settle by a
conciliator selected by the parties. The parties shall request from the board a list of five qualified
conciliators and the parties shall select a single conciliator from the list by alternate striking of
names. If the parties cannot agree upon a conciliator within five days after the board order, the board
shall on the sixth day after its order appoint a conciliator from a list of qualified persons maintained
by the board or shall request a list of qualified conciliators from the American arbitration association
and appoint therefrom.
The following public employees shall not strike:
(a) Members of a police or fire department;
(b) Members of the state highway patrol;
(c) Deputy sheriffs;
(d) Dispatchers employed by a police, fire, or sheriff's department or the state highway patrol
or civilian dispatchers employed by a public employer other than a police, fire, or sheriff's
department to dispatch police, fire, sheriff's department, or emergency medical or rescue personnel
and units;
(e) Members of an exclusive nurse's unit;
(f) Employees of Ohio deaf and blind education services;
(g) Employees of any public employee retirement system;
(h) Corrections officers;
(i) Guards at penal or mental institutions;
(j) Special police officers appointed in accordance with sections 5119.08 and 5123.13 of the
Revised Code;
(k) Psychiatric attendants employed at mental health forensic facilities;
(l) Youth leaders employed at juvenile correctional facilities;

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
37
(m) Members of a law enforcement security force that is established and maintained
exclusively by a board of county commissioners and whose members are employed by that board;
(n) Full-time faculty members of any state institution of higher education.
(2) Public employees other than those listed in division (D)(1) of this section have the right
to strike under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code provided that the employee organization
representing the employees has given a ten-day prior written notice of an intent to strike to the
public employer and to the board, and further provided that the strike is for full, consecutive work
days and the beginning date of the strike is at least ten work days after the ending date of the most
recent prior strike involving the same bargaining unit; however, the board, at its discretion, may
attempt mediation at any time.
(E) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the parties, at any time, from
voluntarily agreeing to submit any or all of the issues in dispute to any other alternative dispute
settlement procedure. An agreement or statutory requirement to arbitrate or to settle a dispute
pursuant to a final offer settlement procedure and the award issued in accordance with the agreement
or statutory requirement is enforceable in the same manner as specified in division (B) of section
4117.09 of the Revised Code.
(F) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a party from seeking enforcement of
a collective bargaining agreement or a conciliator's award as specified in division (B) of section
4117.09 of the Revised Code.
(G) The following guidelines apply to final offer settlement proceedings under division (D)
(1) of this section:
(1) The parties shall submit to final offer settlement those issues that are subject to collective
bargaining as provided by section 4117.08 of the Revised Code and upon which the parties have not
reached agreement and other matters mutually agreed to by the public employer and the exclusive
representative; except that the conciliator may attempt mediation at any time.
(2) The conciliator shall hold a hearing within thirty days of the board's order to submit to a
final offer settlement procedure, or as soon thereafter as is practicable.
(3) The conciliator shall conduct the hearing pursuant to rules developed by the board. The
conciliator shall establish the hearing time and place, but it shall be, where feasible, within the
jurisdiction of the state. Not later than five calendar days before the hearing, each of the parties shall
submit to the conciliator, to the opposing party, and to the board, a written report summarizing the
unresolved issues, the party's final offer as to the issues, and the rationale for that position.
(4) Upon the request by the conciliator, the board shall issue subpoenas for the hearing.
(5) The conciliator may administer oaths.
(6) The conciliator shall hear testimony from the parties and provide for a written record to
be made of all statements at the hearing. The board shall submit for inclusion in the record and for
consideration by the conciliator the written report and recommendation of the fact-finders.
(7) After hearing, the conciliator shall resolve the dispute between the parties by selecting,

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
38
on an issue-by-issue basis, from between each of the party's final settlement offers, taking into
consideration the following:
(a) Past collectively bargained agreements, if any, between the parties;
(b) Comparison of the issues submitted to final offer settlement relative to the employees in
the bargaining unit involved with those issues related to other public and private employees doing
comparable work, giving consideration to factors peculiar to the area and classification involved;
(c) The interests and welfare of the public, the ability of the public employer to finance and
administer the issues proposed, and the effect of the adjustments on the normal standard of public
service;
(d) The lawful authority of the public employer;
(e) The stipulations of the parties;
(f) Such other factors, not confined to those listed in this section, which are normally or
traditionally taken into consideration in the determination of the issues submitted to final offer
settlement through voluntary collective bargaining, mediation, fact-finding, or other impasse
resolution procedures in the public service or in private employment.
(8) Final offer settlement awards made under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code are subject
to Chapter 2711. of the Revised Code.
(9) If more than one conciliator is used, the determination must be by majority vote.
(10) The conciliator shall make written findings of fact and promulgate a written opinion and
order upon the issues presented to the conciliator, and upon the record made before the conciliator
and shall mail or otherwise deliver a true copy thereof to the parties and the board.
(11) Increases in rates of compensation and other matters with cost implications awarded by
the conciliator may be effective only at the start of the fiscal year next commencing after the date of
the final offer settlement award; provided that if a new fiscal year has commenced since the issuance
of the board order to submit to a final offer settlement procedure, the awarded increases may be
retroactive to the commencement of the new fiscal year. The parties may, at any time, amend or
modify a conciliator's award or order by mutual agreement.
(12) The parties shall bear equally the cost of the final offer settlement procedure.
(13) Conciliators appointed pursuant to this section shall be residents of the state.
(H) All final offer settlement awards and orders of the conciliator made pursuant to Chapter
4117. of the Revised Code are subject to review by the court of common pleas having jurisdiction
over the public employer as provided in Chapter 2711. of the Revised Code. If the public employer
is located in more than one court of common pleas district, the court of common pleas in which the
principal office of the chief executive is located has jurisdiction.
(I) The issuance of a final offer settlement award constitutes a binding mandate to the public
employer and the exclusive representative to take whatever actions are necessary to implement the
award.
Sec. 4117.15. (A) Whenever a strike by members of a police or fire department, members of

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
39
the state highway patrol, deputy sheriffs, dispatchers employed by a police, fire, or sheriff's
department or the state highway patrol or civilian dispatchers employed by a public employer other
than a police, fire, or sheriff's department to dispatch police, fire, sheriff's department, or emergency
medical or rescue personnel and units, an exclusive nurse's unit, employees of Ohio deaf and blind
education services, employees of any public employee retirement system, correction officers, guards
at penal or mental institutions, or special police officers appointed in accordance with sections
5119.08 and 5123.13 of the Revised Code, psychiatric attendants employed at mental health forensic
facilities, youth leaders employed at juvenile correctional facilities, or members of a law
enforcement security force that is established and maintained exclusively by a board of county
commissioners and whose members are employed by that boardpublic employees who are prohibited
from striking under division (D)(1) of section 4117.14 of the Revised Code, a strike by other public
employees during the pendency of the settlement procedures set forth in section 4117.14 of the
Revised Code, or a strike during the term or extended term of a collective bargaining agreement
occurs, the public employer may seek an injunction against the strike in the court of common pleas
of the county in which the strike is located.
(B) An unfair labor practice by a public employer is not a defense to the injunction
proceeding noted in division (A) of this section. Allegations of unfair labor practices during the
settlement procedures set forth in section 4117.14 of the Revised Code shall receive priority by the
state employment relations board.
(C) No public employee is entitled to pay or compensation from the public employer for the
period engaged in any strike.
S 2. That existing sections 3335.02, 3335.09, 3337.01, 3339.01, 3341.02, 3343.02,
ECTION
3344.01, 3345.45, 3350.10, 3352.01, 3356.01, 3359.01, 3361.01, 3362.01, 3364.01, 4117.14, and
4117.15 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.
S 3. That section 3333.045 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.
ECTION
S 4. The Department of Higher Education shall conduct a feasibility study about
ECTION
implementing bachelor's degree programs that require three years to complete in this state. The study
shall investigate a variety of fields of study and determine the feasibility of reducing specific course
requirements, quantity of electives, and total credit hours required for graduation. However, the
study shall not include the use of College Credit Plus or any other current programs used to
accelerate degree programs. Finally, the study shall present and evaluate potential issues related to
accreditation.
Not later than one year after the effective date of this section, the Department shall submit to
the General Assembly, in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code, a report about the

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
40
study's findings.
S 5. This act shall be known as The Advance Ohio Higher Education Act.
ECTION

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

Sub. S. B. No. 1 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________